Vermont, session 2025-2026, H715.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1432 is amended to read:
§ 1432. MENSTRUAL PRODUCTS
(a) By enacting this statute, the General Assembly intends to ensure that all
students attending a public school, or an approved independent school, or a
VT LEG #386132 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.715
2026 Page 2 of 2
postsecondary school located in Vermont have access to menstrual products at
no cost and without having to request them.
(b)(1) A school district, and an approved independent school, and a
postsecondary school located in Vermont shall make menstrual products
available at no cost for each school within the district or under the jurisdiction
of the board of the independent school or postsecondary school in:
(A) a majority of gender-neutral bathrooms and bathrooms
designated for female students that are generally used by students who are
eight years of age or older; and
(B) the school nurse’s office or school-operated health center.
(2) The school district, or independent school, or postsecondary school,
in consultation with the school nurse or other medical professional who
provides services to the school, shall determine which of the gender-neutral
bathrooms and bathrooms designated for female students to stock with
menstrual products and which brands to use.
(c) School districts, and approved independent schools, and postsecondary
schools located in Vermont shall bear the cost of supplying menstrual products
and may seek grants or partner with a nonprofit or community-based
organization to fulfill this obligation.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386132 v.1